South Carolina, session 2025-2026, H4582.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  Chapter 59, Title 59 of the S.C. Code is amended by adding: Section 59-59-260. (A) Beginning in the 2026-2027 School Year, each school district may provide age-appropriate instruction to students on how to access, utilize, and critically evaluate various artificial intelligence tools within the curriculum taught by the educator. The instruction must be aligned with the guidance issued by the Department of Education pursuant to subsection (B). (B) The Department of Education shall issue guidance to school districts on how to implement the provisions of subsection (A). The guidance must include, but is not limited to, the following instructional components: (1) introducing basic artificial intelligence concepts; (2) demonstrating practical applications of artificial intelligence; (3) teaching responsible artificial intelligence usage; (4) how to access relevant artificial intelligence tools; and (5) developing critical thinking skills to analyze artificial intelligence. (C) Subject to available funding, the Department of Education shall provide a professional development program in artificial intelligence education for educators. SECTION 2.  This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----